Virginia statutes. Title 13.1. Corporations.
Chapter 11. Industrial Development Corporations.

§ 13.1-981.
How chapter cited.

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the “Virginia Industrial Development Corporation Act.”

History.

Code 1950, § 13.1-140; 1960, c. 80; 1985, c. 522.

Editor’s note.

As to the repeal of Chapters 1 and 2 of this title and the enactment of Chapters 9, 10, and 11 in lieu thereof, see the Editor’s note under §

13.1-601

.

§ 13.1-982.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter, unless a different meaning is required by the context, the following words and phrases shall have the following meanings:

“Board of directors.”
— The board of directors of a corporation created under this chapter.

“Commission.”
— The State Corporation Commission of Virginia.

“Corporation.”
— A Virginia industrial development corporation created under the provisions of this chapter.

“Financial institution.”
— Any bank, trust company, savings institution, industrial loan association or insurance company.

“Loan limit.”
— For any member, the maximum amount permitted to be outstanding at one time on loans made by such member to a corporation as determined under the provisions of this chapter.

“Member.”
— Any financial institution which shall undertake to lend money to a corporation created under this chapter, upon its call and in accordance with the provisions of this chapter.

History.

Code 1950, § 13.1-141; 1960, c. 80; 1985, c. 522; 1996, c. 77.

§ 13.1-983.
Incorporation.

An industrial development corporation may be incorporated in the Commonwealth pursuant to the provisions of Article 3 (§

13.1-618

et seq.) of Chapter 9 of this title, and all the provisions of Chapter 9 (§

13.1-601

et seq.) of this title not in conflict with or inconsistent with the provisions of this chapter shall apply to such corporation except as hereinafter otherwise provided. The purpose clause of the articles of incorporation shall recite that the purposes for which the corporation is formed are to stimulate and promote the business prosperity and economic welfare of the Commonwealth and its citizens; to encourage and assist through financial aid, advice, technical assistance and other appropriate means the location of new businesses and industries and the rehabilitation, improvement and expansion of existing businesses and industries throughout the Commonwealth; and in furtherance of such purposes, to cooperate with the Virginia Economic Development Partnership and with other organizations, public and private.

History.

Code 1950, § 13.1-142; 1960, c. 80; 1984, c. 750; 1985, c. 522; 1996, cc. 590, 598.

§ 13.1-984.
Corporate name.

Every corporation created under this chapter shall have as part of its corporate name or title the words “Industrial Development.”

History.

Code 1950, § 13.1-143; 1960, c. 80; 1985, c. 522.

§ 13.1-985.
Governor to approve articles of incorporation.

The articles of incorporation shall not be issued by the Commission unless approved by the Governor in writing. Such approval shall not be given by the Governor until he first shall have sought the advice of the Chief Executive Officer of the Virginia Economic Development Partnership.

History.

Code 1950, § 13.1-144; 1960, c. 80; 1985, c. 522; 1996, cc. 590, 598; 2010, c. 869.

The 2010 amendments.

The 2010 amendment by c. 869 substituted “the Chief Executive Officer” for “the Executive Director.”

§ 13.1-986.
How funds may be derived.

A corporation created under this chapter may derive funds from the sale of its shares and debentures, from loans from its members on the terms and conditions set forth in this chapter, from any other financial institution or person and from any agency established by the federal government or the Commonwealth of Virginia.

History.

Code 1950, § 13.1-144.1; 1972, c. 693; 1985, c. 522.

§ 13.1-987.
Restrictions on powers of corporation.

The powers of a corporation shall be subject to the following restrictions:

It shall not approve any application for a loan until the applicant shall have shown that he has applied to a financial institution that could lawfully lend the amount of money sought and that the financial institution has refused in writing to make the requested loan.

It shall not incur any secondary liability for the debts of others, but may assume primary liability therefor.

It shall not give security for any loan made to it unless all loans to it are secured ratably in proportion to unpaid balances due, except that it may give security or priority on loans made to it by any federal agency or instrumentality or by any agency or instrumentality of the Commonwealth of Virginia without securing all loans made to it.

History.

Code 1950, § 13.1-145; 1960, c. 80; 1972, c. 693; 1985, c. 522.

§ 13.1-988.
Acquisition, transfer, etc., of securities and shares of corporation.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, any person, corporation, including a public service corporation, financial institution or railroad may acquire, hold, sell, assign, transfer, mortgage, pledge or otherwise dispose of any bonds, notes, debentures, securities or other evidences of indebtedness, or the shares of capital stock of a corporation created hereunder, provided that the amount of capital stock which may be acquired by any member of such corporation shall not exceed ten percent of the loan limit of such member.

History.

Code 1950, § 13.1-146; 1960, c. 80; 1985, c. 522.

§ 13.1-989.
Membership in corporation; loans from members.

Any financial institution is authorized to become a member of a corporation by making application to the board of directors on such form and in such manner as the board of directors may require and membership shall become effective upon acceptance of such application by the board. Membership shall be for the duration of the corporation, provided, however, that upon written notice given to the corporation two years in advance, a member may withdraw from membership at the expiration date of such notice and shall not thereafter be obligated to make any loans to the corporation.

Each member shall make loans to the corporation as and when called upon by it to do so. Such loans shall be made upon terms and conditions as shall be approved from time to time by the board of directors, subject to the following conditions:

All loans shall be evidenced by transferable instruments of the corporation and shall bear interest at a rate of not less than one-half of one percent in excess of the rate of interest determined by the board of directors to be prevalent commercial banking prime or base rate on unsecured commercial loans as of the date of the loan.

If expressly provided in such call, the loan may provide for a rate of interest which fluctuates with the prime or base rate from time to time and which would be subject during the life of the loan to adjustment as of each interest period commencing after the next interest payment date.

All loan limits shall be established at the $1000 amount nearest to the amount computed in accordance with the provisions of this section.

No loan pursuant to call under this section to a development corporation shall be made if immediately thereafter the total amount of the obligations of the corporation would exceed ten times the amount of its outstanding and unimpaired capital stock, its earned and unimpaired surplus established pursuant to §

13.1-994

and any indebtedness expressly subordinated to loans made pursuant to call under this section.

The total amount outstanding at any one time on loans to a development corporation made by any member shall not exceed the following limit, to be determined as of the time such member becomes a member, on the basis of figures contained in the most recent year-end statement furnished by such member to state or federal supervisory authorities, as the case may be: two percent of the capital and permanent surplus of banks and trust companies; one-half of one percent of the total outstanding loans made by a savings institution, or $250,000, whichever is less; one percent of the total outstanding loans made by an industrial loan company; one percent of the capital and unassigned surplus of stock insurance companies, except fire insurance companies; one percent of the unassigned surplus of mutual insurance companies, except fire insurance companies; one-tenth of one percent of the assets of fire insurance companies.

All loan limits shall be recomputed as of January 1 of each even-numbered year, but no member’s loan limit shall be increased as the result of such recomputation without the consent of such member.

Each call for loans made by the corporation shall be prorated among the members of the corporation in substantially the same proportion that the adjusted loan limit of each member bears to the aggregate of the adjusted loan limits of all members. The “adjusted loan limit” of a member shall be the amount of such member’s loan limit, reduced by the balance of outstanding loans made by such member to the corporation and the investment of such member in capital stock of the corporation at the time of such call.

A member of a corporation created under this chapter shall not be a member of more than one such corporation.

History.

Code 1950, § 13.1-147; 1960, c. 80; 1962, c. 159; 1972, c. 693; 1985, c. 522; 1996, c. 77.

§ 13.1-990.
Shares and shareholders.

Each share of common stock of a corporation shall have a par value of $100, and shall be issued for cash.

Each shareholder shall be entitled to one vote, in person or by proxy, for each share of capital stock held, and each member shall be entitled to one vote, in person or by proxy, for each $1000 of the authorized loan limit of such member as determined under §

13.1-989

.

The rights given by Chapter 9 (§

13.1-601

et seq.) of this title to shareholders to attend meetings and to receive notice thereof and to exercise voting rights shall apply to members as well as to shareholders of a corporation created hereunder. The voting rights of the members shall be the same as if they were a separate class of shareholders, and shareholders and members shall in all cases vote separately by classes. A quorum at a meeting shall require the presence in person or by proxy of a majority of the holders of the voting rights of each class.

History.

Code 1950, § 13.1-148; 1960, c. 80; 1972, c. 693; 1985, c. 522.

§ 13.1-991.
Directors.

The business and affairs of a corporation shall be conducted by a board of directors. The number of directors shall be a multiple of three. Two-thirds of the directors shall be elected by the members and one-third shall be elected by the shareholders. Any vacancy in the office of a director elected by the members may be filled by the directors elected by the members and any vacancy in the office of director elected by the shareholders may be filled by the directors elected by the shareholders. The shareholders and members or the directors may by bylaw provide that a quorum of the board of directors for the purpose of transaction of business shall consist of a stated number or percentage of the directors less than a majority of the number of directors fixed by the bylaws; but in no event shall a quorum consist of less than one-third of the number of directors so fixed.

History.

Code 1950, § 13.1-149; 1960, c. 80; 1968, c. 254; 1985, c. 522.

§ 13.1-992.
Executive committee.

The board of directors, by a resolution adopted by a majority of the directors present and constituting a quorum at any meeting, may designate five or more directors to constitute an executive committee which, to the extent provided in such resolution or the bylaws of the corporation, shall have and may exercise all the authority of the board of directors except the authority to approve an amendment to the articles of incorporation or a plan of merger. The executive committee specifically shall have the right to make calls upon the membership under §

13.1-989

, unless expressly provided to the contrary by such resolution or bylaw. Such committee shall have the power to fill any vacancy occurring in the board of directors or in the executive committee. Such vacancy shall be filled by the affirmative vote of a majority of the remaining members of the executive committee, though less than a quorum of the committee, unless expressly provided to the contrary by such resolution or bylaw.

History.

Code 1950, § 13.1-149.1; 1972, c. 693; 1985, c. 522.

§ 13.1-993.
Restrictions on amendments to articles of incorporation.

No amendment to the articles of incorporation shall be made which increases the obligation of a member to make loans to the corporation or which makes any change in the principal amount, interest rate, maturity date, or in the security or credit position of any outstanding loan made by a member to the corporation or which affects the right of a member to withdraw from membership or the voting rights of such member, without the consent of each member who would be affected by such amendment.

History.

Code 1950, § 13.1-150; 1960, c. 80; 1985, c. 522.

§ 13.1-994.
Earned surplus.

Each year the corporation shall set apart as earned surplus not less than ten percent of its net earnings for the preceding fiscal year until such surplus shall be equal in value to one-half of the amount paid in on the capital stock then outstanding. Whenever the amount of surplus so established shall become impaired, it shall be built up again to the required amount in the manner provided for its original accumulation.

History.

Code 1950, § 13.1-151; 1960, c. 80; 1985, c. 522.

§ 13.1-995.
Members to have rights of shareholders.

The rights given to shareholders under the provisions of §§

13.1-614

,

13.1-624

,

13.1-629

,

13.1-742

and

13.1-744

shall apply to members as well as to shareholders of a corporation created hereunder.

History.

Code 1950, § 13.1-152; 1960, c. 80; 1985, c. 522.

§ 13.1-996.
Corporation not authorized to receive money on deposit; deposit of funds of corporation.

No corporation organized under the provisions of this chapter shall at any time be authorized to receive money on deposit. The corporation shall not deposit any of its funds in any banking institution unless such institution has been designated as a depository by appropriate vote of the board of directors or executive committee.

History.

Code 1950, § 13.1-153; 1960, c. 80; 1972, c. 693; 1985, c. 522.

§ 13.1-997.
Books and records.

A corporation shall keep, in addition to the books and records required by §

13.1-770

, a record showing the names and addresses of all members of the corporation and the current status of loans made by each to the corporation. Members shall have the same rights with respect to such books and records as are given to shareholders by §

13.1-770

.

History.

Code 1950, § 13.1-154; 1960, c. 80; 1985, c. 522.

§ 13.1-998.
Credit of Commonwealth not pledged.

Under no circumstances is the credit of the Commonwealth pledged herein.

History.

Code 1950, § 13.1-155; 1960, c. 80; 1985, c. 522.